data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:jaraangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:taraangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:taraangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:KGUARDtaraangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:KGUARDtaraangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:saraangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:saraangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:kaangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:kaangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:gaangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:gaangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:SUPPRraangamikkit # ;
++jaraangamikkit+tv-freq-3d-3p:SUPPRraangamikkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:jaraangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:jaraangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:taraangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:taraangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:KGUARDtaraangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:KGUARDtaraangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:saraangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:saraangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:kaangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:kaangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:gaangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:gaangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:SUPPRraangakkit # ;
++jaraangakkit+tv-freq-4d-3p:SUPPRraangakkit QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:jaraangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:jaraangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:taraangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:taraangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:KGUARDtaraangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:KGUARDtaraangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:saraangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:saraangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:kaangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:kaangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:gaangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:gaangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:SUPPRraangapsinga # ;
++jaraangapsinga+tv-freq-2p-1s:SUPPRraangapsinga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:jaraangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:jaraangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:taraangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:taraangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:KGUARDtaraangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:KGUARDtaraangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:saraangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:saraangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:kaangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:kaangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:gaangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:gaangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:SUPPRraangaminga # ;
++jaraangaminga+tv-freq-3p-1s:SUPPRraangaminga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:jaraangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:jaraangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:taraangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:taraangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:KGUARDtaraangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:KGUARDtaraangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:saraangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:saraangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:kaangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:kaangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:gaangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:gaangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:SUPPRraangaanga # ;
++jaraangaanga+tv-freq-4p-1s:SUPPRraangaanga QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:jaraangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:jaraangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:taraangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:taraangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:KGUARDtaraangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:KGUARDtaraangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:saraangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:saraangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:kaangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:kaangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:gaangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:gaangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:SUPPRraangaptigit # ;
++jaraangaptigit+tv-freq-1p-2s:SUPPRraangaptigit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:jaraangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:jaraangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:taraangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:taraangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:KGUARDtaraangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:KGUARDtaraangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:saraangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:saraangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:kaangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:kaangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:gaangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:gaangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:SUPPRraangamitit # ;
++jaraangamitit+tv-freq-3p-2s:SUPPRraangamitit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:jaraangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:jaraangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:taraangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:taraangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:KGUARDtaraangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:KGUARDtaraangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:saraangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:saraangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:kaangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:kaangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:gaangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:gaangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:SUPPRraangaatit # ;
++jaraangaatit+tv-freq-4p-2s:SUPPRraangaatit QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:jaraangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:jaraangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:taraangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:taraangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:KGUARDtaraangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:KGUARDtaraangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:saraangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:saraangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:kaangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:kaangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:gaangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:gaangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:SUPPRraangaptigu # ;
++jaraangaptigu+tv-freq-1p-3s:SUPPRraangaptigu QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:jaraangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:jaraangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:taraangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:taraangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:KGUARDtaraangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:KGUARDtaraangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:saraangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:saraangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:kaangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:kaangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:gaangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:gaangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:SUPPRraangapsiuk # ;
++jaraangapsiuk+tv-freq-2p-3s:SUPPRraangapsiuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:jaraangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:jaraangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:jaraangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:jaraangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:taraangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:taraangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:KGUARDtaraangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:KGUARDtaraangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:saraangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:saraangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:taraangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:taraangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:KGUARDtaraangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:KGUARDtaraangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:saraangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:saraangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:kaangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:kaangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:gaangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:gaangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:kaangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:kaangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:gaangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:gaangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:SUPPRraangamijjuk # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:SUPPRraangamijjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:SUPPRraangamiku # ;
++jaraangamijjuk+tv-freq-3p-3s:SUPPRraangamiku QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:jaraangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:jaraangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:taraangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:taraangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:KGUARDtaraangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:KGUARDtaraangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:saraangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:saraangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:kaangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:kaangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:gaangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:gaangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:SUPPRraangajjuk # ;
++jaraangajjuk+tv-freq-4p-3s:SUPPRraangajjuk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:jaraangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:jaraangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:taraangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:taraangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:KGUARDtaraangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:KGUARDtaraangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:saraangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:saraangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:kaangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:kaangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:gaangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:gaangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:SUPPRraangaptiguk # ;
++jaraangaptiguk+tv-freq-2p-1d:SUPPRraangaptiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:jaraangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:jaraangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:taraangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:taraangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:KGUARDtaraangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:KGUARDtaraangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:saraangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:saraangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:kaangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:kaangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:gaangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:gaangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:SUPPRraangamitiguk # ;
++jaraangamitiguk+tv-freq-3p-1d:SUPPRraangamitiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:jaraangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:jaraangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:taraangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:taraangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:KGUARDtaraangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:KGUARDtaraangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:saraangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:saraangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:kaangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:kaangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:gaangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:gaangaatiguk QParticles ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:SUPPRraangaatiguk # ;
++jaraangaatiguk+tv-freq-4p-1d:SUPPRraangaatiguk QParticles ;
